District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.01

Voluntary dissolution — Application for decree or to court.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1316, ch. 854, § 768
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(d)(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-221.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-401.
1973 Ed., § 29-701.